Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201560-124
Motorcycle, defined.

Motorcycle means any motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground. Motorcycle does not include an autocycle.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 24;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 5.
August 30, 2015